Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-305
Telephones; free or underpriced service to city or village officers; acceptance by officer; prohibited; penalties.

It shall be unlawful for any telephone company to furnish to any elected or appointed officer of any city or village in this state a telephone free of charge, or for a price less than is charged other customers for similar service, or for any such officer to accept such telephone or telephone service free of charge, or at a price less than shall be charged to other customers for similar service. Any violation of this section by a telephone company shall be a Class III misdemeanor, and the officer or agent of any such telephone company acting or assisting in such violation shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Any violation of this section by any officer of any such city or village shall be a Class III misdemeanor, and the officer shall upon conviction forfeit the office held by him or her at the time of committing such offense.

Laws 1897, c. 13, § 3, p. 137;

R.S.1913, § 5218;

C.S.1922, § 4419;

C.S.1929, § 18-403;

R.S.1943, § 18-305;

Laws 1982, LB 347, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 5.